Utah statutes.
78B-15-312.   Release of information.

The Office of Vital Records may release information relating to the declaration of paternity or denial of paternity to a signatory of the declaration or denial and to tribunals and federal, tribal, and state support-enforcement agencies of this or another state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

